Florida, session 2026, SB496.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 50 51 Section 1.âThis act may be cited as the âHistoric Florida 52 Monuments and Memorials Protection Act.â 53 Section 2.âSection 267.201, Florida Statutes, is created to 54 read: 55 267.201âProtection of historic monuments and memorials.â 56 (1)âAs used in this section, the term: 57 (a)ââDepartmentâ means the Department of State. 58 (b)ââHistoric Florida military monument or memorialâ means 59 a historic Florida monument or memorial that honors or recounts 60 the military service of any past or present military personnel, 61 including service in any armed conflict since settlers from 62 other countries came to what is now the United States. 63 (c)ââHistoric Florida monument or memorialâ means a 64 permanent statue, marker, plaque, flag, banner, cenotaph, 65 religious symbol, painting, seal, tombstone, or display 66 constructed and located on public property which has been 67 displayed for at least 25 years, with the intent of being 68 permanently displayed or perpetually maintained, and which is 69 dedicated to any person, place, or event that was important in 70 the past or which is in remembrance or recognition of a 71 significant person or event in state history. 72 (d)ââLocal governmentâ means any municipality, county, 73 school district, state college, state university, or other 74 political subdivision of the state. 75 (2)(a)âIt is the intent of the Legislature to declare void 76 all ordinances, regulations, and executive actions regarding the 77 removal, damage, or destruction of historic Florida monuments or 78 memorials which have been enacted by any local government. 79 (b)âIt is also the intent of the Legislature that the state 80 act to protect each historic Florida monument or memorial from 81 removal, damage, or destruction. The Legislature finds that an 82 accurate and factual history belongs to all Floridians and 83 future generations and that the state has an obligation to 84 protect and preserve such history. 85 (c)âFurther, it is the intent of the Legislature to provide 86 statewide uniformity through the division. It is also the 87 Legislatureâs intent for the division to work actively to 88 protect and preserve each historic Florida monument or memorial 89 and ensure that each such monument or memorial is not removed, 90 damaged, or destroyed, regardless of the location of such 91 monument or memorial in this state, and to consult with the 92 Department of Veteransâ Affairs on actions regarding all 93 historic Florida military monuments or memorials. 94 (3)(a)âAny removal of, damage to, or destruction of 95 historic Florida monuments or memorials is preempted to the 96 state. Any existing or future local government ordinance, 97 regulation, or rule to the contrary, or any such action by an 98 elected or appointed local government official, other than those 99 authorized in subsection (6), is void. 100 (b)âA local government may not enact or enforce any local 101 ordinance, regulation, or rule removing or destroying a historic 102 Florida monument or memorial. 103 (4)(a)âA local government or an elected or appointed local 104 government official who violates subsection (3) by enacting or 105 enforcing a local ordinance, regulation, or rule impinging upon 106 such preemption is liable as provided in this subsection. 107 (b)âIf a local government violates subsection (3), the 108 court must declare the ordinance, regulation, or rule invalid 109 and issue a permanent injunction against the local government, 110 prohibiting the enforcement of such ordinance, regulation, or 111 rule. It is not a defense that, in enacting or enforcing the 112 ordinance, regulation, or rule, the local government was acting 113 in good faith or upon the advice of counsel. 114 (c)âThe court shall assess a civil fine of up to $1,000 115 against an elected or appointed local government official who 116 knowingly and willfully violates subsection (3). 117 (d)âExcept as required by applicable law, public funds may 118 not be used to defend or reimburse the unlawful conduct of an 119 elected or appointed local government official found to have 120 knowingly and willfully violated subsection (3). 121 (e)1.âA person or an organization described in subparagraph 122 2. may file suit against a local government or an elected or 123 appointed local government official in any court of this state 124 having jurisdiction over the defendant to the suit for 125 declaratory or injunctive relief and for actual damages, as 126 limited herein, caused by a violation. A court shall award a 127 prevailing plaintiff in any such suit: 128 a.âReasonable attorney fees and costs in accordance with 129 the laws of this state; and 130 b.âThe actual damages incurred, up to $100,000. 131 2.âThe following have standing to bring a civil action for 132 a violation of subsection (3): 133 a.âA group involved in the design, erection, or maintenance 134 of the monument or memorial or a member of such group; or 135 b.âA group or person regularly using the monument or 136 memorial for remembrance. 137 (5)âIf a historic Florida monument or memorial is removed, 138 damaged, or destroyed by a local government in violation of 139 subsection (3), the local government is liable for restoring or 140 relocating such monument or memorial to its original condition 141 or location or as close as possible to the original condition or 142 location within 3 years after the date of the removal, damage, 143 or destruction. If the local government does not have the 144 necessary funds for the restoration or relocation, the state 145 must restore or relocate such monument or memorial, and the 146 department must withhold from the local government all arts, 147 cultural, and historic preservation funding until the local 148 government reimburses the state for the cost of restoring or 149 relocating such monument or memorial. All such funds become 150 available to the local government once the state is repaid. The 151 local government may not retroactively collect any of the 152 department funds that otherwise would have been received during 153 the period that state funds were withheld. 154 (6)(a)âA local government may temporarily remove and 155 relocate a historic Florida monument or memorial only due to 156 military necessity or for any construction or infrastructure 157 project. 158 (b)âThe local government proposing to remove and relocate a 159 Florida historic monument or memorial shall put into an escrow 160 account a good faith estimate of the funds necessary to 161 temporarily relocate such monument or memorial. 162 (c)âA historic Florida monument or memorial that is 163 temporarily removed must be moved to a site of similar 164 prominence, honor, visibility, and access within the same county 165 or municipality in which the monument or memorial was originally 166 located. 167 (d)1.âA local government shall provide written notification 168 to the division, on a form prescribed by the department in 169 consultation with the Department of Veteransâ Affairs: 170 a.âOf the temporary removal and relocation of a historic 171 Florida monument or memorial. The written notification must be 172 provided within 10 days after the date of the local governmentâs 173 decision to temporarily remove such monument or memorial. 174 b.âThat the military necessity has ceased or that the 175 construction or infrastructure project is completed. The written 176 notification must be provided within a reasonable timeframe, but 177 not more than 30 days after the military necessity has ceased or 178 the construction or infrastructure project has been completed. 179 2.âThe historic Florida monument or memorial must be moved 180 back to the original location or, if that is not possible, to a 181 site with similar prominence, honor, visibility, and access 182 within the same county or municipality, as determined by the 183 division. The division may request recommendations for such 184 locations from the Florida Historical Commission or, for a 185 historic Florida military monument or memorial, from the 186 Department of Veteransâ Affairs. 187 (7)âThe division shall make a written record of its 188 decision to act or defer action on any issue regarding the 189 protection, preservation, or relocation of a historic Florida 190 monument or memorial. The division may not require a local 191 government to expend funds on a historic Florida monument or 192 memorial in instances unrelated to subsection (5) or subsection 193 (6). 194 (8)âThe department, in consultation with the Department of 195 Veteransâ Affairs, may adopt rules to implement this section. 196 Section 3.âThis act shall take effect upon becoming a law.